California, session 20252026, AB1481.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17054.6 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17054.6. (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 2026, and before January 1, 2030, 2031, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the filling fee for a federal Petition for Alien Relative (I-130) form. following:(1) For a qualified taxpayer who files a paper federal Petition for Alien Relative (I-130) form, six hundred seventy-five dollars ($675).(2) For a qualified taxpayer who files an online federal Petition for Alien Relative (I-130) form, six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625).(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means a natural person. person whose adjusted gross income is either of the following:(1) In the case of spouses filing a joint return, heads of household, and surviving spouses, as defined in Section 17046, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less for that taxable year.(2) For all other individuals, one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) or less for that taxable year.(c) Each						(1) A qualified taxpayer shall only be eligible for one credit allowed by this section per taxable year.(2) In the case of two taxpayers filing a joint return, only one credit may be claimed per taxable year. In the case of two taxpayers who may legally file a joint return but file separate returns, only one of the taxpayers may claim the credit allowed by this section per taxable year.(d) Any deduction or credit otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of qualified income upon which the credit is based shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section.(e) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and for the seven succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.(f) A qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board, at the board’s request and in the form and manner specified by the board, any information regarding the credit allowed under this section deemed necessary by the Franchise Tax Board for administration of this section.(g) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(A) The specific goal of the credit is to support legal immigration by offsetting the cost of the I-130 filing fee to ensure that excessive expenses do not burden families pursuing lawful unification and by reinforcing the value of legal immigration to our communities and economy.(B) Detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the credits meet that goal are as follows:(i) The total dollar amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this section.(ii) The number of taxpayers that were allowed a tax credit pursuant to this section.(2) (A) On or before January 1, 2030, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the total dollar amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this section and the number of taxpayers allowed a credit pursuant to this section.(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(g)(h) This section shall become inoperative on December 1, 2030. 2031.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.